Maryland, session 2026, HB0208.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
10–926.
(A) THE PURPOSE OF THIS SECTION IS TO ENABLE A NEW OWNER OF REAL
PROPERTY TO ENGAGE IN LEGAL PROCEEDINGS TO PROTECT THE PROPERTY
DURING THE PROCESSING TIME REQUIRED FOR THE RECORDATION OF A DEED.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0208*

HOUSE BILL 208
(B) (1) IN A PROCEEDING INVOLVING REAL PROPERTY, EVIDENCE THAT
A DEED HAS BEEN SUBMITTED FOR RECORDATION TO THE CLERK OF THE CIRCUIT
COURT OF THE COUNTY WHERE THE REAL PROPERTY IS LOCATED, OR OTHER
DOCUMENTS REQUIRED BY LAW FOR THE SALE OF REAL PROPERTY OR TO SECURE A
MORTGAGE, MAY BE USED TO ESTABLISH A REBUTTABLE PRESUMPTION OF
OWNERSHIP OF THE PROPERTY.
(2) EVIDENCE PRODUCED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION MAY INCLUDE:
(I) A CERTIFIED COPY OF THE COMPLETED INTAKE SHEET
REQUIRED FOR RECORDATION UNDER § 3–104 OF THE REAL PROPERTY ARTICLE;
OR
(II) A HUD–1 SETTLEMENT STATEMENT OR CLOSING
DISCLOSURE REQUIRED UNDER THE FEDERAL REAL ESTATE SETTLEMENT
PROCEDURES ACT.
(C) THE SUPREME COURT OF MARYLAND MAY ADOPT RULES AND FORMS
TO IMPLEMENT THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION.
Article – Real Property
3–101.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, no estate of inheritance or
freehold, declaration or limitation of use, estate above seven years, or deed may pass or
take effect unless the deed granting it is executed and recorded.
(b) Subsection (a) of this section does not limit any other method of transferring
or creating an estate, declaration, or limitation which is permitted by the law of the State
except to the extent required by law.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.